Utah statutes.
63M-1-1303.    Creation of council -- Membership.

(1)  There is created the Governor's Economic Development Coordinating Council, hereafter referred to in this part as the "council", consisting of the following 11 members:

(a)  the director, who shall serve as chair of the council;

(b)  the chair of the board or the chair's designee;

(c)  the chair of the Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority or the chair's designee;

(d)  the chair of the Utah Rural Development Council or the chair's designee;

(e)  the chair of the Utah Capital Investment Corporation or the chair's designee;

(f)  the chair of the Economic Development Corporation of Utah or its successor organization or the chair's designee;

(g)  the chair of the World Trade Center Utah or its successor organization or the chair's designee; and

(h)  four members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, who have expertise in the area of business or economic development, entrepreneurship, or the raising of venture or seed capital for research and business growth.

(2) (a)  The four members appointed by the governor may serve for no more than two consecutive two-year terms.

(b)  The governor shall appoint a replacement if a vacancy occurs from the membership described under Subsection (1)(h).

(3)  Six members of the council constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting council business and the action of a majority of a quorum constitutes the action of the council.

(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service on the council, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107; and

(b)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(5)  The office shall provide office space and administrative staff support for the council.

(6)  The council, as a governmental entity, has all the rights, privileges, and immunities of a governmental entity of the state and its meetings are subject to Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.

